New York, session 2025-2026, S4460.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 400 of the county law, as amended 2 by chapter 654 of the laws of 1952, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. Coroners. (a) Each county, excluding Lewis county and Madison coun- 4 ty, shall abolish the office of coroner. 5 (b) At least one hundred fifty days prior to any general election and 6 subject to a permissive referendum, the board of supervisors shall have 7 power by local law to abolish the office of coroner and create the 8 office of medical examiner. 9 (c) The terms of office of all coroners elected or appointed and hold- 10 ing office in the county at the time [such local law becomes effective] 11 such office is abolished shall expire upon the appointment and quali- 12 fication of the medical examiner and at the general election to be held 13 in such year and thereafter no coroners shall be elected in the county. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 15 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07002-01-5